Illinois, session 104th, HB1059.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Military Veterans Assistance Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 45/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3081)7    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Veteran" means any person who (i) served on active duty 9in the armed forces for at least 90 days and whose last 10discharge or release was under conditions other than 11dishonorable; or (ii) served on active duty, to include active 12duty solely for training purposes, in the armed forces, and 13was awarded a service-connected disability or who died in such 14service under conditions other than dishonorable; or (iii) 15served in the National Guard or as a reservist in any branch of 16the armed forces, including active duty solely for training 17purposes, and was awarded a service-connected disability or 18who died in such service under conditions other than 19dishonorable; or (iv) is determined to be a veteran according 20to the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs; provided, that in 21any case, the service of such person qualified under items (i) 22through (iv) was entered into or served in Illinois, or such 23person has resided in the State for one day, except for the   HB1059- 2 -LRB104 02856 KTG 12866 b1purpose of determining the residential eligibility of a 2deceased veteran's dependents. 3    "Veteran service organization" means a post, ship, camp, 4chapter, or detachment of a congressionally chartered or state 5chartered organization that (i) is formed by and for veterans, 6(ii) has a paid membership of at least 15 individuals, and 7(iii) provides responsible aid, assistance, or services to the 8veteran community. 9    "Administrator of military veterans assistance" means the 10commanders of the various veteran service organizations, the 11superintendent of a County Veterans Assistance Commission, or 12other persons whose duty it is, under the existing statutes, 13to care for, relieve or maintain, wholly or in part, any person 14who may be entitled to such assistance under the statutes of 15the State of Illinois. This Act shall not infringe upon the 16mandated powers and authorities vested in the Illinois 17Department of Veterans' Affairs.18(Source: P.A. 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.)